Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 3. Management of the Common Interest Community
38-33.3-304.
Transfer of special declarant rights.

A special declarant right created or reserved under this article may be transferred only by an instrument evidencing the transfer recorded in every county in which any portion of the common interest community is located. The instrument is not effective unless executed by the transferee.

Upon transfer of any special declarant right, the liability of a transferor declarant is as follows:

A transferor is not relieved of any obligation or liability arising before the transfer and remains liable for warranty obligations imposed upon such transferor by this article. Lack of privity does not deprive any unit owner of standing to bring an action to enforce any obligation of the transferor.

If a successor to any special declarant right is an affiliate of a declarant, the transferor is jointly and severally liable with the successor for the liabilities and obligations of the successor which relate to the common interest community.

If a transferor retains any special declarant rights but transfers other special declarant rights to a successor who is not an affiliate of the declarant, the transferor is liable for any obligations or liabilities imposed on a declarant by this article or by the declaration relating to the retained special declarant rights and arising after the transfer.

A transferor has no liability for any act or omission or any breach of a contractual or warranty obligation arising from the exercise of a special declarant right by a successor declarant who is not an affiliate of the transferor.

Unless otherwise provided in a mortgage instrument, deed of trust, or other agreement creating a security interest, in case of foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under bankruptcy or receivership proceedings of any units owned by a declarant or real estate in a common interest community subject to development rights, a person acquiring title to all the property being foreclosed or sold succeeds to only those special declarant rights related to that property held by that declarant which are specified in a written instrument prepared, executed, and recorded by such person at or about the same time as the judgment or instrument or by which such person obtained title to all of the property being foreclosed or sold.

Upon foreclosure of a security interest, sale by a trustee under an agreement creating a security interest, tax sale, judicial sale, or sale under bankruptcy act or receivership proceedings of all interests in a common interest community owned by a declarant:

The declarant ceases to have any special declarant rights; and

The period of declarant control terminates unless the instrument which is required by subsection (3) of this section to be prepared, executed, and recorded at or about the same time as the judgment or instrument conveying title provides for transfer of all special declarant rights to a successor declarant.

The liabilities and obligations of persons who succeed to special declarant rights are as follows:

A successor to any special declarant right who is an affiliate of a declarant is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed on any declarant by this article or by the declaration.

A successor to any special declarant right, other than a successor described in paragraph (c) or (d) of this subsection (5) or a successor who is an affiliate of a declarant, is subject to all obligations and liabilities imposed by this article or the declaration:

On a declarant which relate to the successor’s exercise or nonexercise of special declarant rights; or

On the declarant’s transferor, other than:

Misrepresentations by any previous declarant;

Warranty obligations on improvements made by any previous declarant or made before the common interest community was created;

Breach of any fiduciary obligation by any previous declarant or such declarant’s appointees to the executive board; or

Any liability or obligation imposed on the transferor as a result of the transferor’s acts or omissions after the transfer.

A successor to only a right reserved in the declaration to maintain models, sales offices, and signs, if such successor is not an affiliate of a declarant, may not exercise any other special declarant right and is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant.

A successor to all special declarant rights held by a transferor who succeeded to those rights pursuant to the instrument prepared, executed, and recorded by such person pursuant to the provisions of subsection (3) of this section may declare such successor’s intention in such recorded instrument to hold those rights solely for transfer to another person. Thereafter, until transferring all special declarant rights to any person acquiring title to any unit or real estate subject to development rights owned by the successor or until recording an instrument permitting exercise of all those rights, that successor may not exercise any of those rights other than the right held by such successor’s transferor to control the executive board in accordance with the provisions of section 38-33.3-303 (5) for the duration of any period of declarant control, and any attempted exercise of those rights is void. So long as a successor declarant may not exercise special declarant rights under this subsection (5), such successor declarant is not subject to any liability or obligation as a declarant, other than liability for the successor’s acts and omissions under section 38-33.3-303 (4).

Nothing in this section subjects any successor to a special declarant right to any claims against or other obligations of a transferor declarant, other than claims and obligations arising under this article or the declaration.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1740, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-305.
Termination of contracts and leases of declarant.

The following contracts and leases, if entered into before the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to section 38-33.3-303 (7) takes office, may be terminated without penalty by the association, at any time after the executive board elected by the unit owners pursuant to section 38-33.3-303 (7) takes office, upon not less than ninety days’ notice to the other party:

Any management contract, employment contract, or lease of recreational or parking areas or facilities;

Any other contract or lease between the association and a declarant or an affiliate of a declarant; or

Any contract or lease that is not bona fide or was unconscionable to the unit owners at the time entered into under the circumstances then prevailing.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to any lease the termination of which would terminate the common interest community or reduce its size, unless the real estate subject to that lease was included in the common interest community for the purpose of avoiding the right of the association to terminate a lease under this section or a proprietary lease.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-306.
Bylaws.

In addition to complying with applicable sections, if any, of the “Colorado Business Corporation Act”, articles 101 to 117 of title 7, C.R.S., or the “Colorado Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act”, articles 121 to 137 of title 7, C.R.S., if the common interest community is organized pursuant thereto, the bylaws of the association must provide:

The number of members of the executive board and the titles of the officers of the association;

Election by the executive board of a president, a treasurer, a secretary, and any other officers of the association the bylaws specify;

The qualifications, powers and duties, and terms of office of, and manner of electing and removing, executive board members and officers and the manner of filling vacancies;

Which, if any, of its powers the executive board or officers may delegate to other persons or to a managing agent;

Which of its officers may prepare, execute, certify, and record amendments to the declaration on behalf of the association; and

A method for amending the bylaws.

Subject to the provisions of the declaration, the bylaws may provide for any other matters the association deems necessary and appropriate.

If an association with thirty or more units delegates powers of the executive board or officers relating to collection, deposit, transfer, or disbursement of association funds to other persons or to a managing agent, the bylaws of the association shall require the following:

That the other persons or managing agent maintain fidelity insurance coverage or a bond in an amount not less than fifty thousand dollars or such higher amount as the executive board may require;

That the other persons or managing agent maintain all funds and accounts of the association separate from the funds and accounts of other associations managed by the other persons or managing agent and maintain all reserve accounts of each association so managed separate from operational accounts of the association;

That an annual accounting for association funds and a financial statement be prepared and presented to the association by the managing agent, a public accountant, or a certified public accountant.

Repealed.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1743, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 92:

(3) added, p. 2096, § 1, effective July 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1464, § 10, effective June 6; IP(1) amended, p. 865, § 40, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 96:

(3)(b) repealed, p. 1088, § 2, effective May 23.

L. 97:

IP(1) amended, p. 764, § 36, effective July 1, 1998.

38-33.3-307.
Upkeep of the common interest community.

Except to the extent provided by the declaration, subsection (2) of this section, or section 38-33.3-313 (9), the association is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of the common elements, and each unit owner is responsible for maintenance, repair, and replacement of such owner’s unit. Each unit owner shall afford to the association and the other unit owners, and to their agents or employees, access through such owner’s unit reasonably necessary for those purposes. If damage is inflicted, or a strong likelihood exists that it will be inflicted, on the common elements or any unit through which access is taken, the unit owner responsible for the damage, or expense to avoid damage, or the association if it is responsible, is liable for the cost of prompt repair.

(1.5)

Maintenance, repair, or replacement of any drainage structure or facilities, or other public improvements required by the local governmental entity as a condition of development of the common interest community or any part thereof shall be the responsibility of the association, unless such improvements have been dedicated to and accepted by the local governmental entity for the purpose of maintenance, repair, or replacement or unless such maintenance, repair, or replacement has been authorized by law to be performed by a special district or other municipal or quasi-municipal entity.

In addition to the liability that a declarant as a unit owner has under this article, the declarant alone is liable for all expenses in connection with real estate within the common interest community subject to development rights. No other unit owner and no other portion of the common interest community is subject to a claim for payment of those expenses. Unless the declaration provides otherwise, any income or proceeds from real estate subject to development rights inures to the declarant. If the declarant fails to pay all expenses in connection with real estate within the common interest community subject to development rights, the association may pay such expenses, and such expenses shall be assessed as a common expense against the real estate subject to development rights, and the association may enforce the assessment pursuant to section 38-33.3-316 by treating such real estate as if it were a unit. If the association acquires title to the real estate subject to the development rights through foreclosure or otherwise, the development rights shall not be extinguished thereby, and, thereafter, the association may succeed to any special declarant rights specified in a written instrument prepared, executed, and recorded by the association in accordance with the requirements of section 38-33.3-304 (3).

In a planned community, if all development rights have expired with respect to any real estate, the declarant remains liable for all expenses of that real estate unless, upon expiration, the declaration provides that the real estate becomes common elements or units.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1744, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 651, § 17, effective April 30.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 483, § 14, effective July 1.

38-33.3-308.
Meetings.

Meetings of the unit owners, as the members of the association, shall be held at least once each year. Special meetings of the unit owners may be called by the president, by a majority of the executive board, or by unit owners having twenty percent, or any lower percentage specified in the bylaws, of the votes in the association. Not less than ten nor more than fifty days in advance of any meeting of the unit owners, the secretary or other officer specified in the bylaws shall cause notice to be hand delivered or sent prepaid by United States mail to the mailing address of each unit or to any other mailing address designated in writing by the unit owner. The notice of any meeting of the unit owners shall be physically posted in a conspicuous place, to the extent that such posting is feasible and practicable, in addition to any electronic posting or electronic mail notices that may be given pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection (2) of this section. The notice shall state the time and place of the meeting and the items on the agenda, including the general nature of any proposed amendment to the declaration or bylaws, any budget changes, and any proposal to remove an officer or member of the executive board.

All regular and special meetings of the association’s executive board, or any committee thereof, shall be open to attendance by all members of the association or their representatives. Agendas for meetings of the executive board shall be made reasonably available for examination by all members of the association or their representatives.

The association is encouraged to provide all notices and agendas required by this article in electronic form, by posting on a website or otherwise, in addition to printed form. If such electronic means are available, the association shall provide notice of all regular and special meetings of unit owners by electronic mail to all unit owners who so request and who furnish the association with their electronic mail addresses. Electronic notice of a special meeting shall be given as soon as possible but at least twenty-four hours before the meeting.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(i), this paragraph (b) shall not apply to an association that includes time-share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7), C.R.S.

(2.5)

Notwithstanding any provision in the declaration, bylaws, or other documents to the contrary, all meetings of the association and board of directors are open to every unit owner of the association, or to any person designated by a unit owner in writing as the unit owner’s representative.

At an appropriate time determined by the board, but before the board votes on an issue under discussion, unit owners or their designated representatives shall be permitted to speak regarding that issue. The board may place reasonable time restrictions on persons speaking during the meeting. If more than one person desires to address an issue and there are opposing views, the board shall provide for a reasonable number of persons to speak on each side of the issue.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(i), this subsection (2.5) shall not apply to an association that includes time-share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

The members of the executive board or any committee thereof may hold an executive or closed door session and may restrict attendance to executive board members and such other persons requested by the executive board during a regular or specially announced meeting or a part thereof. The matters to be discussed at such an executive session shall include only matters enumerated in paragraphs

to (f) of subsection (4) of this section.

Matters for discussion by an executive or closed session are limited to:

Matters pertaining to employees of the association or the managing agent’s contract or involving the employment, promotion, discipline, or dismissal of an officer, agent, or employee of the association;

Consultation with legal counsel concerning disputes that are the subject of pending or imminent court proceedings or matters that are privileged or confidential between attorney and client;

Investigative proceedings concerning possible or actual criminal misconduct;

Matters subject to specific constitutional, statutory, or judicially imposed requirements protecting particular proceedings or matters from public disclosure;

Any matter the disclosure of which would constitute an unwarranted invasion of individual privacy;

Review of or discussion relating to any written or oral communication from legal counsel.

(4.5)

Upon the final resolution of any matter for which the board received legal advice or that concerned pending or contemplated litigation, the board may elect to preserve the attorney-client privilege in any appropriate manner, or it may elect to disclose such information, as it deems appropriate, about such matter in an open meeting.

Prior to the time the members of the executive board or any committee thereof convene in executive session, the chair of the body shall announce the general matter of discussion as enumerated in paragraphs

to (f) of subsection (4) of this section.

No rule or regulation of the board or any committee thereof shall be adopted during an executive session. A rule or regulation may be validly adopted only during a regular or special meeting or after the body goes back into regular session following an executive session.

The minutes of all meetings at which an executive session was held shall indicate that an executive session was held and the general subject matter of the executive session.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1745, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 888, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 484, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4)(a) amended and (4)(f) added, p. 768, § 5, effective August 7.

L. 2005:

(3) and (5) amended, p. 781, § 71, effective June 1; (1) and (2) amended and (2.5) and (4.5) added, p. 1384, § 14, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1), (2.5)(a), and (2.5)(b) amended, p. 1222, § 10, effective May 26.

38-33.3-309.
Quorums.

Unless the bylaws provide otherwise, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the association if persons entitled to cast twenty percent, or, in the case of an association with over one thousand unit owners, ten percent, of the votes which may be cast for election of the executive board are present, in person or by proxy at the beginning of the meeting.

Unless the bylaws specify a larger percentage, a quorum is deemed present throughout any meeting of the executive board if persons entitled to cast fifty percent of the votes on that board are present at the beginning of the meeting or grant their proxy, as provided in section 7-128-205 (4), C.R.S.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1745, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 484, § 16, effective July 1.

38-33.3-310.
Voting - proxies.

If only one of the multiple owners of a unit is present at a meeting of the association, such owner is entitled to cast all the votes allocated to that unit. If more than one of the multiple owners are present, the votes allocated to that unit may be cast only in accordance with the agreement of a majority in interest of the owners, unless the declaration expressly provides otherwise. There is majority agreement if any one of the multiple owners casts the votes allocated to that unit without protest being made promptly to the person presiding over the meeting by any of the other owners of the unit.

Votes for contested positions on the executive board shall be taken by secret ballot. This sub-subparagraph (A) shall not apply to an association whose governing documents provide for election of positions on the executive board by delegates on behalf of the unit owners.
(b) (I) (A) Votes for contested positions on the executive board shall be taken by secret ballot. This sub-subparagraph (A) shall not apply to an association whose governing documents provide for election of positions on the executive board by delegates on behalf of the unit owners.

At the discretion of the board or upon the request of twenty percent of the unit owners who are present at the meeting or represented by proxy, if a quorum has been achieved, a vote on any matter affecting the common interest community on which all unit owners are entitled to vote shall be by secret ballot.

Ballots shall be counted by a neutral third party or by a committee of volunteers. Such volunteers shall be unit owners who are selected or appointed at an open meeting, in a fair manner, by the chair of the board or another person presiding during that portion of the meeting. The volunteers shall not be board members and, in the case of a contested election for a board position, shall not be candidates.

The results of a vote taken by secret ballot shall be reported without reference to the names, addresses, or other identifying information of unit owners participating in such vote.

Notwithstanding section 38-33.3-117 (1.5)(j), this paragraph (b) shall not apply to an association that includes time-share units, as defined in section 38-33-110 (7).

Votes allocated to a unit may be cast pursuant to a proxy duly executed by a unit owner. A proxy shall not be valid if obtained through fraud or misrepresentation. Unless otherwise provided in the declaration, bylaws, or rules of the association, appointment of proxies may be made substantially as provided in section 7-127-203, C.R.S.

If a unit is owned by more than one person, each owner of the unit may vote or register protest to the casting of votes by the other owners of the unit through a duly executed proxy. A unit owner may not revoke a proxy given pursuant to this section except by actual notice of revocation to the person presiding over a meeting of the association. A proxy is void if it is not dated or purports to be revocable without notice. A proxy terminates eleven months after its date, unless it provides otherwise.

The association is entitled to reject a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature on it or about the signatory’s authority to sign for the unit owner.

The association and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Any action of the association based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, written ballot, waiver, proxy appointment, or proxy appointment revocation under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

If the declaration requires that votes on specified matters affecting the common interest community be cast by lessees rather than unit owners of leased units:

The provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section apply to lessees as if they were unit owners;

Unit owners who have leased their units to other persons may not cast votes on those specified matters; and

Lessees are entitled to notice of meetings, access to records, and other rights respecting those matters as if they were unit owners.

Unit owners must also be given notice, in the manner provided in section 38-33.3-308, of all meetings at which lessees are entitled to vote.

No votes allocated to a unit owned by the association may be cast.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1745, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 2005:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1385, § 15, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

(1)(b)(I) amended, p. 1223, § 11, effective May 26.

38-33.3-310.5.
Executive board - conflicts of interest - definitions.

Section 7-128-501, C.R.S., shall apply to members of the executive board; except that, as used in that section:

“Corporation” or “nonprofit corporation” means the association.

“Director” means a member of the association’s executive board.

“Officer” means any person designated as an officer of the association and any person to whom the board delegates responsibilities under this article, including, without limitation, a managing agent, attorney, or accountant employed by the board.

History.

Source:
L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 1386, § 16, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2006:

Entire section R&RE, p. 1223, § 12, effective May 26.

38-33.3-311.
Tort and contract liability.

Neither the association nor any unit owner except the declarant is liable for any cause of action based upon that declarant’s acts or omissions in connection with any part of the common interest community which that declarant has the responsibility to maintain. Otherwise, any action alleging an act or omission by the association must be brought against the association and not against any unit owner. If the act or omission occurred during any period of declarant control and the association gives the declarant reasonable notice of and an opportunity to defend against the action, the declarant who then controlled the association is liable to the association or to any unit owner for all tort losses not covered by insurance suffered by the association or that unit owner and all costs that the association would not have incurred but for such act or omission. Whenever the declarant is liable to the association under this section, the declarant is also liable for all expenses of litigation, including reasonable attorney fees, incurred by the association. Any statute of limitation affecting the association’s right of action under this section is tolled until the period of declarant control terminates. A unit owner is not precluded from maintaining an action contemplated by this section by being a unit owner or a member or officer of the association.

The declarant is liable to the association for all funds of the association collected during the period of declarant control which were not properly expended.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1746, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

38-33.3-312.
Conveyance or encumbrance of common elements.

In a condominium or planned community, portions of the common elements may be conveyed or subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association, including sixty-seven percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action; except that all owners of units to which any limited common element is allocated must agree in order to convey that limited common element or subject it to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association.

Part of a cooperative may be conveyed and all or part of a cooperative may be subjected to a security interest by the association if persons entitled to cast at least sixty-seven percent of the votes in the association, including sixty-seven percent of the votes allocated to units not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies, agree to that action; except that, if fewer than all of the units or limited common elements are to be conveyed or subjected to a security interest, then all unit owners of those units, or the units to which those limited common elements are allocated, must agree in order to convey those units or limited common elements or subject them to a security interest. The declaration may specify a smaller percentage only if all of the units are restricted exclusively to nonresidential uses. Proceeds of the sale are an asset of the association. Any purported conveyance or other voluntary transfer of an entire cooperative, unless made in compliance with section 38-33.3-218, is void.

An agreement to convey, or subject to a security interest, common elements in a condominium or planned community, or, in a cooperative, an agreement to convey, or subject to a security interest, any part of a cooperative, must be evidenced by the execution of an agreement, in the same manner as a deed, by the association. The agreement must specify a date after which the agreement will be void unless approved by the requisite percentage of owners. Any grant, conveyance, or deed executed by the association must be recorded in every county in which a portion of the common interest community is situated and is effective only upon recordation.

The association, on behalf of the unit owners, may contract to convey an interest in a common interest community pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, but the contract is not enforceable against the association until approved pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section and executed and ratified pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Thereafter, the association has all powers necessary and appropriate to effect the conveyance or encumbrance, including the power to execute deeds or other instruments.

Unless in compliance with this section, any purported conveyance, encumbrance, judicial sale, or other transfer of common elements or any other part of a cooperative is void.

A conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section shall not deprive any unit of its rights of ingress and egress of the unit and support of the unit.

Unless the declaration otherwise provides, a conveyance or encumbrance of common elements pursuant to this section does not affect the priority or validity of preexisting encumbrances.

In a cooperative, the association may acquire, hold, encumber, or convey a proprietary lease without complying with this section.

History.

Source:
L. 91:

Entire article added, p. 1747, § 1, effective July 1, 1992.

L. 93:

(1) and (5) amended, p. 652, § 18, effective April 30.

L. 98:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 484, § 17, effective July 1.